Arkansas, session 2025, HB1183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 87, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 — Registered Dialysis Patient Care Technician Act

17-87-901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as "the "Registered"
Dialysis Patient Care Technician Act".

17-87-902. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to ensure the health, safety, and
welfare of the public by providing for the accurate, cost-effective, and safe
utilization of dialysis patient care technicians in the administration of
hemodialysis.

17-87-903. Definition.
As used in this subchapter, "dialysis patient care technician" means a
person who meets the requirements of § 17-87-905.

*JMB003*
02-11-2025 10:54:08 JMB003

As Engrossed: H1/27/25 H1/29/25 S2/11/25 HB1183

17-87-904. Tasks performed.
A dialysis patient care technician may administer direct patient care
and hemodialysis, including administering associated medications and central
venous catheter access and care, under the authority of a registered nurse
licensed in this state who may delegate tasks based on nursing judgment to a
dialysis patient care technician based on the dialysis patient care
technician’s education, knowledge, training, and skill.

17-87-905. Registration.
(a) To register as a dialysis patient care technician, an individual
shall:
(1) Possess a high school diploma or a general educational
development certificate;
(2) Demonstrate that he or she:
(A) Is employed as a dialysis patient care technician;
(B) Is enrolled in a training course that follows national
recommendations for dialysis patient care technicians and is conducted
primarily in a work setting; or
(C) Has completed a training course that follows national
recommendations for dialysis patient care technicians with verification of
competency and a skills checklist signed by the medical director of the
facility that employs the person;
(3) (A) Obtain national certification by successful passage of
a national certification examination within eighteen (18) months of becoming
employed as a dialysis patient care technician.
(B)(i) A dialysis patient care technician shall recertify
national certification at intervals required by the organization providing
the certification examination.
(ii) The intervals required under subdivision
(a)(3)(B)(i) of this section shall include no fewer than thirty (30) and no
more than forty (40) patient contact hours since the previous certification
or recertification;
(4) Submit an application with the Arkansas State Board of
Nursing; and
(5) Pay the applicable fee as determined by the board.
02-11-2025 10:54:08 JMB003

As Engrossed: H1/27/25 H1/29/25 S2/11/25 HB1183
(b)(1) An applicant for registration as a dialysis patient care
technician shall report to the board, in writing, any conviction for a felony
or misdemeanor.
(2) A conviction is not a disqualification for registration
under this section unless the conviction relates to the criminal offenses
listed in § 17-3-102.
(c)(1) An applicant or a dialysis patient care technician may report
any pardon or setting aside of a conviction to the board.
(2) If a pardon or setting aside has been obtained, the
conviction for which the pardon or setting aside was obtained shall not be
maintained on the Dialysis Patient Care Technician Registry created under §
17-87-906.
(d) If a person registered as a dialysis patient care technician
becomes licensed as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse, his or
her registration as a dialysis patient care technician shall terminate as of
the date of licensure as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse.
(e)(1) The board shall refuse to register or shall revoke the
registration of a person who would be disqualified from employment under §
20-33-213.
(2) The board may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a
registration of a dialysis patient care technician for:
(A) Securing a registration under this subchapter through
fraud or deceit;
(B) Unprofessional conduct, unethical conduct, gross
ignorance, or inefficiency in the conduct of his or her practice;
(C) Using a false name or an alias in his or her practice;
(D) Violating any provision of this subchapter; or
(E) Failing to comply with any of the requirements for
registration.
(3) Proceedings under this section shall be conducted in
accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et
seq.

17-87-906. Dialysis Patient Care Technician Registry — Contents of
registry.
(a)(1) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing shall list each dialysis
02-11-2025 10:54:08 JMB003

As Engrossed: H1/27/25 H1/29/25 S2/11/25 HB1183
patient care technician registrant on a registry to be named the "Dialysis
Patient Care Technician Registry".
(2) A listing in the registry is valid for the term of the
registration and upon renewal unless the listing is refused renewal or is
removed.
(b) The registry shall contain the following information on each
person who is a registered dialysis patient care technician:
(1) The individual’s full name;
(2) Any conviction of a felony or misdemeanor reported to the
board;
(3) A certificate showing completion of a nationally recognized
training program; and
(4) A certificate of completion of a nationally commercially
available dialysis patient care technician certification examination.

17-87-907. Construction.
This subchapter does not:
(1) Require a dialysis patient care technician to register as a
medication assistive person under § 17-87-701 et seq.; or
(2) Apply to a dialysis patient care technician who is working
directly with a physician licensed by the Arkansas State Medical Board.

/s/Bentley













02-11-2025 10:54:08 JMB003